Washington statutes.
RCW 9.45.090

Knowingly receiving fraudulent conveyance.

Every person who shall receive any property or conveyance thereof from another, knowing that the same is transferred or delivered to him or her in violation of, or with the intent to violate RCW 9.45.080, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

[ 2011 c 336 s 300; 1909 c 249 s 380; RRS s 2632.]